Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 09. Transportation of Pupils.

Administrative Code. —

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 263 — 269.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 474 — 477.

Relief against school board’s “busing plan” to promote desegregation. 50 ALR3d 1089.

Personal liability of executive or administrative officer unit for personal injury or death of student. 35 ALR4th 272.

Liability of school employee, other than teacher or administrator, for personal injury or death of student. 35 ALR4th 328.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents associated with transportation of students. 23 ALR5th 1.

Sec. 14.09.010.
Transportation of students.

A school district that provides student transportation services for the transportation of students who reside a distance from established schools is eligible to receive funding for operating or subcontracting the operation of the transportation system for students to and from the schools within the student’s transportation service area. Subject to appropriation, the amount of funding provided by the state for operating the student transportation system is the amount of a school district’s ADM, less the ADM for the district’s correspondence programs during the current fiscal year, multiplied by the per student amount for the school district as follows:

The department shall adopt regulations that provide for oversight of and support to school districts in achieving a safe and cost-effective student transportation system. The regulations must include a requirement for contract terms of not less than three years, if feasible, standardized conditions and bid periods, and standards that ensure cost efficiencies and exclusions.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 9 SLA 2008.]

A school district that provides transportation services under this section shall provide transportation services to students attending a charter school operated by the district under a policy adopted by the district. The policy must

be developed with input solicited from individuals involved with the charter school, including staff, students, and parents;

at a minimum, provide transportation services for students enrolled in the charter school on a space available basis along the regular routes that the students attending schools in an attendance area in the district are transported; and

be approved by the department.

If a school district fails to adopt a policy under (d) of this section, the school district shall allocate the amount received for each student under (a) of this section to each charter school operated by the district based on the number of students enrolled in the charter school.

Nothing in (d) of this section requires a school district to establish dedicated transportation routes for the exclusive use of students enrolled in a charter school or authorizes a charter school to opt out of a policy adopted by a school district for the purpose of acquiring transportation funding.

In this section,

“ADM” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“district’s ADM” means the sum of the ADMs in the district.

DISTRICT PER STUDENT AMOUNT (2) (1)
for the school
for the school
years beginning
year beginning
on or after
July 1, 2011
July 1, 2012 Alaska Gateway
$2,081
$2,148 Aleutians East 311
321 Anchorage 435
449 Annette Island 182
188 Bering Strait
48
50 Bristol Bay 2,672 2,758 Chatham
280
289 Copper River 1,586 1,637 Cordova 335
346 Craig 423
437 Delta/Greely 1,656 1,709 Denali 1,808 1,866 Dillingham 1,218 1,257 Fairbanks 817
843 Galena 255
263 Haines 626
646 Hoonah 298
308 Iditarod 211
218 Juneau 604
623 Kake 271
280 Kashunamiut
5
5 Kenai Peninsula
766
944 Ketchikan
727
750 Klawock
584
603 Kodiak Island
799
825 Kuspuk
654
675 Lake and Peninsula
384
396 Lower Kuskokwim
277
286 Lower Yukon
1
1 Matanuska-Susitna
910
939 Nenana
587
606 Nome
621
641 North Slope 1,120 1,156 Northwest Arctic
25
26 Pelican
72
74 Petersburg
374
386 Saint Mary’s
193
199 Sitka
428
442 Skagway
36
37 Southeast Island 1,155 1,192 Southwest Region
598
617 Tanana
478
493 Unalaska
648
669 Valdez
735
759 Wrangell
701
723 Yakutat
744
768 Yukon Flats
264
272 Yukon/Koyukuk
299
309 Yupiit
2
2.

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1966; § 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 2 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 15, 16 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2, 11 ch 9 SLA 2008; am §§ 1, 2 ch 19 SLA 2012; am § 20 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former subsection (c) was enacted as
AS 14.10.070(c). Renumbered in 1966. Subsection (b) was enacted as (d) and relettered in 2012, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (d) [now (g)].

Subsections (d) — (f) were enacted as (e) — (g).
Relettered in 2014, at which time former (d) was relettered as (g) and internal references in (e) and (f) were conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For transportation of pupils, see 4 AAC 27.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment repealed and reenacted (a), effective June 30, 2012, and added (b) (formerly (d)), effective July 1, 2012.
Former (b) was relettered as (d).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (e) through (g) [now (d) through (f)].

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Education may reimburse a school district for the provision of pupil transportation services at a rate lower than the district’s costs. The department should, however, adopt standards of general applicability for determining the reasonable cost basis for reimbursement. Feb. 21, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.09.020.
Transportation for nonpublic school students.

In those places in the state where the department or a school district provides transportation for children attending public schools, the department also shall provide transportation for children who, in compliance with the provisions of AS 14.30, attend nonpublic schools that are administered in compliance with state law where the children, in order to reach the nonpublic schools, must travel distances comparable to, and over routes the same as, the distances and routes over which the children attending public schools are transported.
The commissioner shall administer this nonpublic school student transportation program, integrating it into existing systems as much as feasible, and the cost of the program shall be paid from funds appropriated for that purpose by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 157 SLA 1972)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state financing of private school bus transportation does not violate Alaska Const., art. VII, § 1, which prohibits the payment of money from public funds “for the direct benefit of any religious or private educational institution.” December 17, 1979, Op. Att’y Gen. (superseding June 12, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.).

Sec. 14.09.025.
Drug testing for school bus drivers.

A school district or regional educational attendance area that provides for the transportation of pupils shall require that the drivers of motor vehicles used to transport pupils submit to testing for the use of drugs and alcohol. The testing program must include random testing. A driver who tests positive for the improper use of drugs or alcohol may be disciplined, including termination from employment.

For a driver who is not required to have a commercial driver’s license, an employer

shall keep and maintain records of the testing for improper use of drugs or alcohol on a confidential basis and may only release the results with the written consent of the employee; and

may not retain false positive test results in the employee’s employment records and may not release information about a false positive test without the written consent of the employee.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section. The regulations must include a provision for a hearing before discipline is imposed.

In this section, “improper use of drugs or alcohol” means use that constitutes a criminal offense and use that violates regulations adopted by the department under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 1994)

Sec. 14.09.030.
School buses.

A municipal school district or regional educational attendance area shall

provide instruction on safe boarding, riding, exiting, and emergency procedures to school children transported to or from a public school by school bus;

provide instruction to drivers and passengers on the proper use of seat belts if school children in the municipal school district or regional educational attendance area are transported in buses equipped with seat belts; and

conduct at least three school bus drills each school year in safe boarding, exiting, and emergency procedures; one drill must be conducted during the first three weeks of the school term.

The department shall

establish equipment requirements for each type of school bus that is used to transport school children to or from a public school;

at least twice each calendar year, inspect each school bus for compliance with requirements adopted under this subsection; and

maintain a record of each accident involving a school bus or other vehicle transporting school children that is owned by, leased by, or provided under contract to a municipal school district or regional educational attendance area; the record must include the date of the accident, a list of persons injured, whether the person’s injury occurred within the school bus, and each type of injury.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1999)